California statutes. Penal Code
 in a form and manner prescribed by the department, a report including information concerning that individual and a description of the firearm in question. The department may request photographs of the firearm to determine if the firearm is a generally prohibited weapon, assault weapon, or machinegun, or is otherwise prohibited. A person shall not furnish a fictitious name or address, knowingly furnish any incorrect information, or knowingly omit any information required to be provided in this report.

(B) Sell or transfer the firearm in accordance with the provisions of Section 27545 or in accordance with the provisions of an exemption from Section 27545.

(C) Sell or transfer the firearm to a dealer licensed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2.

(D) Sell or transfer the firearm to a sheriff or police department.

(2) The department shall establish a fee for submission of the form described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) and an additional fee for each additional firearm. This fee shall not exceed the reasonable and actual costs of processing the form submitted pursuant to that paragraph. The department may annually review and adjust this fee to fully fund, but not exceed, these costs.

(3) Upon receipt of the report submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) and the required fee, the department shall examine its records, as well as those records that it is authorized to request from the State Department of State Hospitals
 pursuant to Section 8104 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and records available to the department in the National Instant Criminal Background Check System, to determine if the purchaser is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(b) If all of the following requirements are satisfied, the personal firearm importer shall have complied with the provisions of this section:

(1) The personal firearm importer sells or transfers the firearm pursuant to Section 27545.

(2) The sale or transfer cannot be completed by the dealer to the purchaser or transferee.

(3) The firearm can be returned to the personal
 firearm importer.

(c) (1) The provisions of this section are cumulative and shall not be construed as restricting the application of any other law.

(2) However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by this article and different provisions of the Penal Code shall not be punished under more than one provision.

(d) The department shall conduct a public education and notification program regarding this section to ensure a high degree of publicity of the provisions of this section.

(e) As part of the public education and notification program described in this section, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Work in conjunction with the Department of Motor Vehicles to ensure that any person who is subject to this section is advised of the provisions of this section, and provided with blank copies of the report described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), at the time when that person applies for a California driver’s license or registers a motor vehicle in accordance with the Vehicle Code.

(2) Make the reports referred to in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) available to dealers licensed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2
 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2.

(3) Make the reports referred to in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) available to law enforcement agencies.

(4) Make persons subject to the provisions of this section aware of all of the following:

(A) The report referred to in
 subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) may be completed at either a law enforcement agency or the licensed premises of a dealer licensed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2.

(B) It is advisable to do so for the sake of accuracy and completeness of the report.

(C) Before transporting a firearm to a law enforcement agency to comply with subdivision (a), the person should give notice to the law enforcement agency that the person is doing so.

(D) In any event, the handgun should be transported unloaded and in a locked container and a firearm that is not a handgun should be transported
 unloaded.

(f) Any costs incurred by the department to implement this section shall be absorbed by the department within its existing budget and the fees in the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account allocated for implementation of subdivisions (d) and (e) of this section pursuant to Section 28235.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 540, Sec. 7.   (AB 3064)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

27565.

(a) This section applies in the following circumstances:

(1) A person is licensed as a collector pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(2) The licensed premises of that person are within this state.

(3) The licensed collector acquires, outside of this state, a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm.

(4) The licensed collector takes actual possession of that firearm outside of this state pursuant to the provisions of subsection (j) of Section 923 of Title 18 of
 the United States Code, as amended by Public Law 104-208, and transports the firearm into this state.

(5) The firearm is a curio or relic, as defined in Section 478.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) Within five days of transporting a firearm into this state under the circumstances described in subdivision (a), the licensed collector shall report the acquisition of that firearm to the department in a format prescribed by the department. A person shall not furnish a fictitious name or address, knowingly furnish any incorrect information, or knowingly omit any information required to be provided in this report.

(c) The department shall establish a fee for submission of the report described in this section and an additional fee for each additional firearm. This fee shall not exceed the reasonable and actual costs of processing the report submitted pursuant to this section. The department may annually review and adjust this fee to fully fund, but not exceed, these costs.

(d) The department may request photographs of the firearm to determine if the firearm is a generally prohibited weapon, assault weapon, or machinegun, or is otherwise prohibited.

(e) Upon receipt of a report submitted pursuant to this section and any required fee, the department shall examine its records, as well as those records that it is authorized to request from the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to Section 8104 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and records available to the department in
 the National Instant Criminal Background Check System, to determine if the purchaser is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 540, Sec. 8.   (AB 3064)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

27570.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that a violation of Section 27560 or 27565 shall not constitute a “continuing offense” and the statute of limitations for commencing a prosecution for a violation of Section 27560 or 27565 commences on the date that the applicable grace period specified in Section 27560 or 27565 expires.

(b) Sections 27560 and 27565 shall not apply to a person who reports ownership of a firearm after the applicable grace period specified in Section 27560 or 27565 expires if evidence of that violation arises only as the result of the person submitting the report described in Section 27560 or 27565.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 250, Sec. 9.   (SB 715)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

27573.

(a) A state officer or employee, or operator, lessee, or licensee of any state property, shall not contract for, authorize, or allow the sale of any firearm, firearm precursor part, or ammunition on state property or in the buildings that sit on state property or property otherwise owned, leased, occupied, or operated by the state.

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A gun buyback event held by a law enforcement agency.

(2) The sale of a firearm by a public administrator, public conservator, or public guardian within the course of their duties.

(3) The sale of a firearm, firearm precursor part, or ammunition on state property that occurs pursuant to a contract that was entered into before January 1, 2023.

(4) The purchase of firearms, firearm precursor parts, or ammunition on state property by a law enforcement agency in the course of its regular duties.

(5) The sale or purchase of a firearm pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 145, Sec. 1.   (SB 915)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

27575.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, an officer, employee, operator, lessee, or licensee of the 32nd District Agricultural Association, as defined in Section 3102 of the Food and Agricultural Code, shall not contract for, authorize, or allow the sale of any firearm, firearm precursor part, or ammunition on the property or in the buildings that comprise the OC Fair and Event Center, in the County of Orange, the City of Costa Mesa, or any successor or additional property owned, leased, or otherwise occupied or operated by the district.

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A gun buyback event held by a law enforcement agency.

(2) The sale of a firearm by a public administrator, public conservator, or public guardian within the course of their duties.

(3) The sale of a firearm, firearm precursor part, or ammunition on state property that occurs pursuant to a contract that was entered into before January 1, 2022.

(4) The purchase of ammunition on state property by a law enforcement agency in the course of its regular duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 77.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

27575.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, an officer, employee, operator, lessee, or licensee of the 31st District Agricultural Association, as defined in Section 3102 of the Food and Agricultural Code, shall not contract for, authorize, or allow the sale of any firearm, firearm precursor part, or ammunition on the property or in the buildings that comprise the Ventura County Fair and Event Center, in the County of Ventura, the City of Ventura, or any successor or additional property owned, leased, or otherwise occupied or operated by the district.

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A gun buyback event held by a law enforcement agency.

(2) The sale of a firearm by a public administrator, public conservator, or public guardian within the course of their duties.

(3) The sale of a firearm, firearm precursor part, or ammunition on state property that occurs pursuant to a contract that was entered into before January 1, 2023.

(4) The purchase of ammunition on state property by a law enforcement agency in the course of its regular duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 78.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

27585.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2015, a resident of this state shall not import into this state, bring into this state, or transport into this state, any firearm that the person purchased or otherwise obtained on or after January 1, 2015, from outside of this state unless the person first has that firearm delivered to a dealer in this state for delivery to that resident pursuant to the procedures set forth in Section 27540 and Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to or affect any of the following:

(1) A licensed
 collector who is subject to and complies with Section 27565.

(2) A dealer, if the dealer is acting in the course and scope of their activities as a dealer.

(3) A wholesaler, if the wholesaler is acting in the course and scope of their activities as a wholesaler.

(4) A person licensed as an importer of firearms or ammunition or licensed as a manufacturer of firearms or ammunition, pursuant to Section 921 et seq. of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto if the importer or manufacturer is acting in the course and scope of their activities as a licensed importer or manufacturer.

(5) A personal firearm importer who is subject to
 and complies with Section 27560.

(6) A person who complies with subdivision (b) of Section 27875.

(7) A person who complies with subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 27920.

(8) A person who is on the centralized list of exempted federal firearms licensees pursuant to Section 28450 if that person is acting in the course and scope of their activities as a licensee.

(9) A firearm regulated pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18710) of Division 5 of Title 2 acquired by a person who holds a permit issued pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 18900) of Chapter 1 of Division 5 of Title 2, if that person is acting within the course and
 scope of their activities as a licensee and in accordance with the terms and conditions of the permit.

(10) A firearm regulated pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 30500) of Division 10 acquired by a person who holds a permit issued pursuant to Section 31005, if that person is acting within the course and scope of their activities as a licensee and in accordance with the terms and conditions of the permit.

(11) A firearm regulated pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 32610) of Division 10 acquired by a person who holds a permit issued pursuant to Section 32650, if that person is acting within the course and scope of their activities as a licensee and in accordance with the terms and conditions of the permit.

(12) A
 firearm regulated pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 33300) of Chapter 8 of Division 10 acquired by a person who holds a permit issued pursuant to Section 33300, if that person is acting within the course and scope of their activities as a licensee and in accordance with the terms and conditions of the permit.

(13) The importation of a firearm into the state, bringing a firearm into the state, or transportation of a firearm into the state, that is regulated by any of the following statutes, if the acquisition of that firearm occurred outside of California and is conducted in accordance with the applicable provisions of the following statutes:

(A) Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18710) of Division 5 of Title 2, relating to destructive devices and explosives.

(B) Section 24410, relating to cane guns.

(C) Section 24510, relating to firearms that are not immediately recognizable as firearms.

(D) Sections 24610 and 24680, relating to undetectable firearms.

(E) Section 24710, relating to wallet guns.

(F) Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 30500) of Division 10, relating to assault weapons.

(G) Section 31500, relating to unconventional pistols.

(H) Sections 33215 to 33225, inclusive, relating to short-barreled rifles and short-barreled
 shotguns.

(I) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 32610) of Division 10, relating to machineguns.

(J) Section 33600, relating to zip guns, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, as they relate to zip guns.

(14) The importation, transportation, or bringing of a firearm into the state by a person who meets any of the following criteria:

(A) The person is listed in the registry set forth in Section 11106 as the owner of the firearm.

(B) The person has been issued documentation by the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11106 that
 indicates the person is listed in the centralized registry as owning that firearm.

(C) The person has a copy of a Dealer’s Record of Sale that shows that the person received that firearm from the dealer listed in that Dealer’s Record of Sale and is listed as the owner of the firearm.

(D) If the firearm is a handgun, the person has a license to carry that handgun pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 26150) of Division 5 and the person is licensed to carry that handgun.

(15) A licensed common carrier or an authorized agent or employee of a licensed common carrier, when acting in the course and scope of duties incident to the delivery of or receipt of that firearm in accordance with federal law.

(c) The provisions of this section are cumulative and do not restrict the application of any other law. However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by this section and different provisions of this code shall not be punished under more than one provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 730, Sec. 5.   (AB 879)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

27590.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), (c), or (e), a violation of this article is a misdemeanor.

(b) If any of the following circumstances apply, a violation of this article is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or four years:

(1) If the violation is of subdivision (a) of Section 27500.

(2) If the defendant has a prior conviction of violating the provisions, other than Section 27535, Section 27560 involving a firearm that is not a handgun, or Section 27565 involving a firearm that is not a handgun, of this article
 or former Section 12100 of this code, as Section 12100 read at any time from when it was enacted by Section 3 of Chapter 1386 of the Statutes of 1988 to when it was repealed by Section 18 of Chapter 23 of the Statutes of 1994, or Section 8101 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(3) If the defendant has a prior conviction of violating any offense specified in Section 29905 or of a violation of Section 32625 or 33410, or of former Section 12560, as that section read at any time from when it was enacted by Section 4 of Chapter 931 of the Statutes of 1965 to when it was repealed by Section 14 of Chapter 9 of the Statutes of 1990, or of any provision listed in Section 16590.

(4) If the defendant is in a prohibited class described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or
 Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of this title, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(5) A violation of this article by a person who actively participates in a “criminal street gang” as defined in Section 186.22.

(6) A violation of Section 27510 involving the delivery of any firearm to a person who the dealer knows, or should know, is a minor.

(c) If any of the following circumstances apply, a violation of this article shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment:

(1) A violation of Section 27515, 27520, or subdivision (b) of Section 27500.

(2) A violation of Section 27505 involving the sale, loan, or
 transfer of a handgun or a centerfire semiautomatic rifle to a minor.

(3) A violation of Section 27510 involving the delivery of a
 handgun or a centerfire semiautomatic rifle.

(4) A violation of subdivision (a), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of Section 27540 involving a handgun or a centerfire semiautomatic rifle.

(5) A violation of Section 27545 involving a handgun or a centerfire semiautomatic rifle.

(6) A violation of Section 27550.

(7) A violation of Section 27585 involving a handgun or a centerfire semiautomatic rifle.

(d) If both of the following circumstances apply, an additional term of imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for one, two, or three years shall be imposed in addition and consecutive
 to the sentence prescribed:

(1) A violation of Section 27510 or subdivision (b) of Section 27500.

(2) The firearm transferred in violation of Section 27510 or subdivision (b) of Section 27500 is used in the subsequent commission of a felony for which a conviction is obtained and the prescribed sentence is imposed.

(e) (1) A first violation of Section 27535 is an infraction punishable by a fine of fifty dollars ($50).

(2) A second violation of Section 27535 is an infraction punishable by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100).

(3) A third or subsequent violation of Section 27535 is a misdemeanor.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, each application to purchase a handgun or semiautomatic centerfire rifle in violation of Section 27535 is a separate offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 543, Sec. 2.   (SB 758)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

27595.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), commencing on July 1, 2026, a firearms dealer licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26920, shall not sell, offer for sale, exchange, give, transfer, or deliver any semiautomatic machinegun-convertible pistol, as defined in Section 16885.

(b) (1) A violation of subdivision (a) shall be punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) A second
 violation of subdivision (a) shall be punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and may result in the suspension or revocation of the dealer’s license issued
 under Sections 26700 to 26920, inclusive, and removal of the firearms dealer from any centralized list maintained by the Department of Justice pursuant to Sections 26715, 28450, and 29060.

(3) A third violation of subdivision (a) is a misdemeanor and shall result in the revocation of the dealer’s license issued under Sections 26700 to 26920, inclusive, and removal of the firearms dealer from any centralized list maintained by the Department pursuant to Sections 26715, 28450, and 29060.

(c) This section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) A machinegun-convertible pistol delivered to a firearms dealer prior to January 1, 2026.

(2) The sale of a machinegun-convertible pistol to any of the following entities for lawful use in the discharge of their official duties:

(A) A police department, sheriff’s office, probation department, marshal’s office, district attorney’s office, the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Justice, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(B) Any state agency listed in paragraph (6) or paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 32000.

(C) The military or naval forces of this state or of the United States.

(3) A private party to private party transaction conducted through a licensed firearms dealer pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing
 with Section 28050).

(4) A transfer of a machinegun-convertible pistol to a gunsmith or other qualified entity for service or repair.

(5) The sale or transfer of a machinegun-convertible pistol to a firearms dealer licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26920, inclusive, or to federally licensed firearms manufacturers or dealers outside California.

(6) A transfer of a machinegun-convertible pistol back to a private party after temporary safekeeping storage pursuant to Section 26892.

(7) A transfer of a machinegun-convertible pistol back to a private party after a period of temporary prohibition pursuant to Section 29830.

(8) A transfer of a machinegun-convertible pistol to any forensic laboratory or forensic laboratory employee, while on duty and acting within the scope and course of employment.

(9) The sale of a machinegun-convertible pistol to an individual
 who is an active peace officer described in Section 830.1 or a reserve peace officer described in Section 830.6 who is employed or appointed by a law enforcement agency described in Section 830.1 and is authorized to carry a firearm on duty.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 572, Sec. 5.   (AB 1127)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

27595.1.

The Department of Justice is authorized to adopt regulations to implement Section 27595.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 572, Sec. 6.   (AB 1127)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exceptions Relating to Law Enforcement [27600. - 27620.]

27600.

(a) Article 1 (commencing with Section 27500) does not apply to any sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms made to, or the importation of firearms by, an authorized law enforcement representative of any city, county, city and county, or state, or of the federal government, for exclusive use by that governmental agency if, prior to the sale, delivery, transfer, or importation of these firearms, written authorization from the head of the agency authorizing the transaction is presented to the person from whom the purchase, delivery, or transfer is being made or from whom the firearm is being imported.

(b) Proper written authorization is defined as verifiable written certification from the head of the agency by which the
 purchaser or transferee is employed, identifying the employee as an individual authorized to conduct the transaction, and authorizing the transaction for the exclusive use of the agency by which that person is employed.

(c) Within 10 days of the date a firearm is acquired by the agency, a record of the same shall be entered as an institutional weapon into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency. Any agency without access to the AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(d) Any agency that is the registered owner of an institutional weapon in accordance with subdivision (c) that subsequently destroys that weapon shall enter information that the weapon has been destroyed into the Automated Firearms
 System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) within 10 days of the destruction in accordance with procedures prescribed by the Department of Justice. Any agency without access to the AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 878, Sec. 6.   (AB 1609)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

27605.

Article 1 (commencing with Section 27500) does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The loan is made by an authorized law enforcement representative of a city, county, or city and county, or of the state or federal government.

(b) The loan is made to a peace officer employed by that agency and authorized to carry a firearm.

(c) The loan is made for the carrying and use of that firearm by that peace officer in the course and scope of the officer’s duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27610.

(a) Article 1 (commencing with Section 27500) does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to a peace officer pursuant to Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) Within 10 days of the date that a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is sold, delivered, or transferred pursuant to Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code to that peace officer, the name of the officer and the make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm being sold, delivered, or transferred shall be entered into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency
 that sold, delivered, or transferred the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 31.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

27615.

(a) Article 1 (commencing with Section 27500) does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to a retiring peace officer who is authorized to carry a firearm pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 26300) of Division 5.

(b) Within 10 days of the date that a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is sold, delivered, or transferred to that retiring peace officer, the name of the officer and the make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm being sold, delivered, or transferred shall be entered into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or
 state agency that sold, delivered, or transferred the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 32.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

27620.

Section 27545 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm when made by an authorized law enforcement representative of a city, county, city and county, or of the state or federal government, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The sale, delivery, or transfer is made to one of the following:

(1) A wholesaler.

(2) A manufacturer or importer of firearms or ammunition licensed to engage in that business pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(b) The sale, delivery, or transfer of the firearm is not subject to the procedures set forth in Section 18000, 18005, 34000, or 34005.

(c) Within 10 days of the date that any firearm is delivered pursuant to this section, the governmental agency has entered a record of the delivery into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS). Any agency without access to the AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 738, Sec. 5.   (AB 538)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exceptions Extending Only to Waiting Period [27650. - 27670.]

27650.

(a) The waiting period described in Section 27540 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms made to any person who satisfies both of the following requirements:

(1) The person is properly identified as a full-time paid peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2.

(2) The officer’s employer has authorized the officer to carry firearms while in the performance of duties.

(b) (1) Proper identification is defined as verifiable written certification from the head of the agency by
 which the purchaser or transferee is employed, identifying the purchaser or transferee as a peace officer who is authorized to carry firearms while in the performance of duties, and authorizing the purchase or transfer.(2) The certification shall be delivered to the dealer at the time of purchase or transfer and the purchaser or transferee shall identify himself or herself as the person authorized in the certification.

(3) The dealer shall keep the certification with the record of sale.

(4) On the date that the sale, delivery, or transfer is made, the dealer delivering the firearm shall transmit to the Department of Justice an electronic or telephonic report of the transaction as is indicated in Section 28160 or 28165.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27660.

(a) The waiting period described in Section 27540 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, by a dealer in either of the following situations:

(1) The dealer is delivering the firearm to another dealer, the firearm is not intended as merchandise in the receiving dealer’s business, and the requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) are satisfied.

(2) The dealer is delivering the firearm to himself or herself, the firearm is not intended as merchandise in the dealer’s business, and the requirements of subdivision (c) are satisfied.

(b) If the dealer is receiving the firearm from another dealer, the dealer receiving the firearm shall present proof to the dealer delivering the firearm that the receiving dealer is licensed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800). This shall be done by complying with Section 27555.

(c) (1) Regardless of whether the dealer is selling, delivering, or transferring the firearm to another dealer or to himself or herself, on the date that the application to purchase is completed, the dealer delivering the firearm shall forward by prepaid mail to the Department of Justice a report of the application and the type of information concerning the purchaser or transferee as is indicated in Section 28160.

(2) Where electronic or telephonic transfer of applicant information is used, on the date that
 the application to purchase is completed, the dealer delivering the firearm shall transmit an electronic or telephonic report of the application and the type of information concerning the purchaser or transferee as is indicated in Section 28160.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 34.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

27665.

(a) The waiting period described in Section 27540 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm to the holder of a special weapons permit issued by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 32650 or 33300, pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 18900) of Chapter 1 of Division 5 of Title 2, or pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 32700) of Chapter 6 of Division 10.

(b) On the date that the application to purchase is completed, the dealer delivering the firearm shall transmit to the Department of Justice an electronic or telephonic report of the application as is indicated in Section 28160 or 28165, as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 35.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

27670.

(a) The waiting period described in Section 27540 does not apply to the sale, delivery, loan, or transfer of a firearm if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The firearm is a curio or relic, as defined in Section 478.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor.

(2) The sale, delivery, loan, or transfer is made by a dealer.

(3) The sale, delivery, loan, or transfer is made to a person who is licensed as a collector pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations
 issued pursuant thereto.

(4) The licensed collector has a current certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 26710.

(b) On the date that the sale, delivery, or transfer is made, the dealer delivering the firearm shall transmit to the Department of Justice an electronic or telephonic report of the transaction as is indicated in Section 28160 or 28165.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Exceptions to Restrictions on Delivery of a Firearm [27700. - 27750.]

27700.

Section 27540 does not apply to sales, deliveries, or transfers of firearms between or to importers and manufacturers of firearms licensed to engage in that business pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27705.

Section 27540 does not apply to the delivery of a firearm to a gunsmith for service or repair, or to the return of the firearm to its owner by the gunsmith, or to the delivery of a firearm by a gunsmith to a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code for service or repair and the return of the firearm to the gunsmith.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27715.

Section 27540 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of unloaded firearms by a dealer to a person who resides outside this state and is licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27720.

Section 27540 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of unloaded firearms to a wholesaler if the firearms are being returned to the wholesaler and are intended as merchandise in the wholesaler’s business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27725.

Section 27540 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The firearms are unloaded.

(b) The sale, delivery, or transfer is made by one dealer to another dealer, upon proof of compliance with the requirements of Section 27555.

(c) The firearms are intended as merchandise in the receiving dealer’s business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27730.

Until January 1, 2014, Section 27540 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of an unloaded firearm, other than a handgun, by a dealer to himself or herself.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 37.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

27735.
